District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.07

Advisory Neighborhood Commissions — Determination of election winners.

The candidate in each single-member district receiving the highest number of votes cast in such election shall be declared the winner, except that in the case of a tie the procedures set forth in § 1-1001.10(c) shall govern.

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 9, 22 DCR 2071

History

1981 Ed., § 1-258.
1973 Ed., § 1-171f.

Prior Codifications